Utah statutes.
53A-17a-138.   Increases in value of weighted pupil unit.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the percentage of increase provided
in the value of the weighted pupil unit over the preceding fiscal year
includes funds for increases in the total maintenance and operation budget
including salary increases, lane changes, increments, increased costs of
fringe benefits, building maintenance and for increased energy and property,
casualty, and liability insurance costs over and above that provided for in
the direct appropriation for that purpose.
